North Carolina statutes. Chapter 65. Cemeteries.
Article 6. Cemetery Associations.

§ 65-16.
Land holdings.

All cemetery associations or corporations created by any local, private or special act or resolution before January 10, 1917, are authorized and fully empowered to hold amounts of land in excess of the limitation provided in the local, private or special act or resolution incorporating or chartering such cemetery association or corporation.

History.

1923, c. 76, s. 1; C.S., s. 5030(b).

§ 65-17.
Change of name of association or corporation.

Any corporation or association chartered or incorporated by any special act of the legislature, as set forth in

G.S. 65-16

, is authorized and fully empowered to change the name of such association or corporation by a majority vote of its directors, and upon such change in name it shall be the duty of the officers of the board of directors of such corporation or association to file with the clerk of the superior court a copy of resolution changing the name, which resolution must show the act of the legislature creating or incorporating the same and the reasons for the change thereof.

History.

1923, c. 76, s. 2; C.S., s. 5030(c).

§ 65-17.1.
Quorum at stockholders’ meeting of certain nonprofit cemetery corporations; calling meeting; amendment of charter.

Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of law or of the charter or bylaws of any corporation affected by this section, in the case of any nonprofit cemetery corporation chartered prior to the year 1900 whose charter has expired prior to May 18, 1955, a quorum at any meeting of stockholders called for the purpose of electing directors, or of amending the charter of such corporation, or both, shall consist of the holders of ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding shares of the capital stock of such corporation having voting powers, present in person or represented by proxy; and a meeting of the stockholders of such corporation for such purpose or purposes may be called by any two stockholders after 10 days’ notice by registered mail to all stockholders of record at their last known addresses as shown by the stock book of such corporation. The concurrence of a majority of the shares represented at such meeting shall be sufficient to authorize an amendment or amendments to the charter of such corporation in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 55-31.

History.

1955, c. 1084.